California statutes. Revenue and Taxation Code
(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1242.)
-------------------------------------------

20505.

“Claimant” means an individual who:

(a) For purposes of this chapter was either (1) 62 years of age or older on the last day of the calendar year or approved fiscal year designated in subdivision (b) or (c) of Section 20503, whichever is applicable, or (2) blind or disabled, as defined in Section 12050 of the Welfare and Institutions Code on the last day of the calendar
 year or approved fiscal year designated in subdivision (b) of Section 20503, who was a member of the household, and who was either: (1) the owner and occupier of a residential dwelling on the last day of the year designated in subdivision (b) or (c) of Section 20503, or (2) the renter of a rented residence on or before the last day of the year designated in subdivision (b) of Section 20503. An individual who qualifies as an owner-claimant may not qualify as a renter-claimant for the same year.

(b) For purposes of Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 20581), Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 20625), Chapter 3.3 (commencing with Section 20639), and Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 20640) was a member of the household and either an owner-occupant, or a tenant stockholder occupant, or a possessory interestholder occupant, or a manufactured home owner-occupant, as the case may be, of the residential dwelling as to which postponement is claimed on
 the last day of the year designated in subdivision (d) of Section 20503, and who was (1) 62 years of age or older by December 31 of the fiscal year for which postponement is claimed, or (2) blind or disabled, as defined in Section 12050 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, at the time of application or on February 10 of the fiscal year for which postponement is claimed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 896, Sec. 11.   (SB 1130)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

20506.

In the case of an owner-claimant, “household” includes the claimant and all other persons, except bona fide renters, minors, or students (as defined by Section 151(c)(4) of the Internal Revenue Code), whose principal place of residence is the residential dwelling of the claimant. In the case of a renter-claimant, “household” includes the claimant, his or her spouse, and all other persons who reside on the premises, except renters, minors, or students (as defined by Section 151(c)(4) of the Internal Revenue Code), and owners of the same principal place of residence.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 472, Sec. 20.   Effective October 2, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

20507.

(a) A claimant shall not lose his or her eligibility for purposes of this part if he or she is temporarily confined to a hospital or medical institution for medical reasons where the residential dwelling was the principal place of residence of the claimant immediately prior to such confinement.

(b) For purposes of this section, “medical institution” means a facility operated by, or licensed by, the United States, one of the several states, a political subdivision of a state, the State Department of Health, or exempt from such licensure pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 1312 of the
 Health and Safety Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1242.)
-------------------------------------------

20508.

“Residential dwelling” means a dwelling occupied by the claimant as the principal place of residence, and so much of the land surrounding it as is reasonably necessary for use of the dwelling as a home, owned by the claimant, the claimant and his spouse, or by the claimant and some other individual, and located in this state. It shall also include a residential unit in a cooperative housing corporation (as defined in Section 216(b) of the Internal Revenue Code) occupied by the owner of shares or a membership interest in such corporation as his or her principal residence, mobilehomes which are assessed as realty for local
 property tax purposes and the land on which situated, houseboats, and other similar living accommodations, as well as a part of a multidwelling or multipurpose building and a part of the land upon which it is built. It shall also include premises occupied by reason of the claimant’s ownership of a dwelling located on land owned by a nonprofit incorporated association, of which the claimant is a member, when such association requires the claimant to pay a pro rata share of the property taxes levied against the association’s land. It shall also include premises occupied by a claimant wherein he is required by law to pay a property tax by reason of his ownership (including a possessory interest) in the dwelling, the land, or both. It shall also include a dwelling unit which is a mobilehome owned by a claimant, subject to property taxation pursuant to Part 13 (commencing with Section 5800), and located on land which is owned or rented by such claimant. (Owned includes the interest of a vendee in possession under
 a land sale contract but not the interest of the vendor, the interest of the holder of a life estate interest, but not the interest of a remainderman, and of one or more joint tenants or tenants in common. Except in the case of an unrecorded land sale contract, ownership must be evidenced by a duly recorded document.)

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 488, Sec. 89.   Effective July 28, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

20508.1.

For purposes of Section 20508, “residential dwelling” includes floating homes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 928, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

20509.

“Rented residence” means premises rented and occupied by the claimant as his or her principal place of residence during the calendar year for which assistance is claimed. The term “rented residence” shall not include:

(a) Premises which are exempt from property taxation, except those premises on which the owner pays possessory interest taxes, or makes payments in lieu of property taxes which are substantially equivalent to property taxes paid on properties of comparable market value.

(b) Premises which are not located in this state.

For the purposes of this section, the term “premises” means a house or a dwelling unit used to provide living accommodations in a building or structure and the land incidental thereto, but does not include land only, except in the case where the dwelling unit is a mobilehome subject to the license fee imposed by Part 5 (commencing with Section 10701) of this division. “Rented residence” includes a dwelling unit which is a mobilehome subject to the license fee imposed by Part 5 (commencing with Section 10701) of this division owned by the claimant and located on land which is owned or rented by such claimant.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 285, Sec. 11.6.   Effective June 30, 1980.   Operative July 1, 1980, by Sec. 23 of Ch. 285.)
-------------------------------------------

20510.

“Rent” means amount paid at arms length solely for the right of occupancy of a residence and utility payments required to be paid by the rental agreement. At least fifty dollars ($50) per month must be paid by each renter claimant.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 426, Sec. 20.)
-------------------------------------------

20511.

“Property tax” shall mean only those property taxes for the fiscal year in which application for assistance is made pursuant to Section 20541.

When a residential dwelling is owned by two or more individuals as joint tenants or tenants in common and one or more of such persons is not a member of the claimant’s household, the term “property tax” shall include only that part of the taxes levied which reflects the ownership of the claimant and other members of the household.

The property tax proration required by the preceding sentence shall not apply to the extent of the ownership interest
 of the claimant and one or more of the following:

(a) The claimant’s spouse.

(b) The parents, children (natural or adopted), or grandchildren of either the claimant or the claimant’s spouse, or

(c) The spouse of any person enumerated in subdivision (b) of this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1242.)
-------------------------------------------

20512.

(a) “Property taxes accrued” means current property taxes (exclusive of interest, penalties, principal payments on improvement bonds and charges for service) levied against a claimant’s residential dwelling by any taxing agency (as defined in Section 121) for any fiscal year ending on or after June 30, 1977. If the owner of a dwelling unit which is a mobilehome located on land owned or rented by such owner pursuant to Section 20541 elects to claim assistance under Section 20543, such assistance shall be based on the appropriate percentage of the motor vehicle license fee tax, not including the registration fee, paid with regard to such
 mobilehome.

(b) Whenever a residential dwelling is an integral part of a large unit such as a farm, or a multipurpose or multidwelling building, “property taxes accrued” shall be that percentage of the total property taxes accrued as the value of the residential dwelling is of the total value.

(c) Where a claimant is purchasing the residential dwelling under an unrecorded contract of sale, the Franchise Tax Board may require a copy of the contract or other evidence to establish such fact.

(d) Where the residential dwelling is a dwelling owned by the claimant on land owned by a nonprofit incorporated association, the Franchise Tax Board may require an affidavit under penalty of perjury containing sufficient evidence to establish such fact and that the nonprofit incorporated association requires that the claimant pay a
 pro rata share of the property tax levied against the association’s land.

(e) Where the residential dwelling consists of premises occupied by reason of the claimant’s possessory interest in such premises, the Franchise Tax Board may require an affidavit under penalty of perjury stating that the premises are occupied by reason of ownership of a possessory interest in a dwelling that is otherwise exempt from property taxation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 1199.)
-------------------------------------------

20513.

When a “rented residence,” as defined in Section 20509, is rented and occupied by the claimant as his principal place of residence for less than 12 months during the calendar year for which assistance is claimed, the amount of assistance as provided in Section 20544 shall be prorated pursuant to rules provided by the Franchise Tax Board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1242.)
-------------------------------------------

20514.

(a) Assistance shall not be allowed under this chapter if gross household income, after allowance for actual cash expenditures that are reasonable, ordinary, and necessary to realize income, exceeds thirty-five thousand two hundred fifty-one dollars ($35,251).

(b) With respect to assistance that is provided by the Franchise Tax Board pursuant to this chapter for the 2002 calendar year and each calendar year thereafter, the gross household income figure that applies to
 assistance provided by the Franchise Tax Board during that period shall be the gross household income figure that applied to assistance provided by the Franchise Tax Board in the same period in the immediately preceding year, multiplied by an inflation adjustment factor calculated as follows:

(1) On or before February 1 of each year, the Department of Industrial Relations shall transmit to the Franchise Tax Board the percentage change in the California Consumer Price Index for all items from June of the second preceding calendar year to June of the immediately preceding calendar year.

(2) The Franchise Tax Board shall add 100 percent to the percentage change figure that is furnished pursuant to paragraph (1) and divide the result by 100.

(3) The Franchise Tax Board shall multiply the gross household income figure
 that applies in the immediately preceding year by the inflation adjustment factor determined in paragraph (2), and round off the resulting product to the nearest one dollar ($1).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 374, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Computations [20541. - 20544.]

20541.

(a) Subject to the limitations provided in this chapter a claimant may, to the extent provided in Section 20543 or 20544, whichever is applicable, file with the Franchise Tax Board, pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 20561) of this chapter, a claim for assistance from the State of California of a sum equal to a percentage of the property taxes accrued and paid by the claimant on his residential dwelling or a sum equal to the percentage of the applicable statutory property tax equivalent under Section 20544 with respect to a claimant renting his residence.

(b) The owner of a dwelling unit which is a mobilehome subject to the license fee imposed by Part 5 (commencing with Section 10701) of this division which is located on land which is owned or rented by such owner may elect to file under subdivision (a) for assistance provided in either Section 20543 or 20544.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1252, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

20542.

(a) The Franchise Tax Board, pursuant to the provisions of Article 3 (commencing with Section 20561), of this chapter, shall provide assistance to the claimant based on a percentage of the property tax accrued and paid by the claimant on the residential dwelling as provided in Section 20543 or the statutory property tax equivalent pursuant to Section 20544. In case of an owner-claimant, the
 assistance shall be equal to the applicable percentage of property taxes paid on the full value of the residential dwelling up to, and including, thirty-four thousand dollars ($34,000). No assistance shall be allowed for property taxes paid on that portion of full value of a residential dwelling exceeding thirty-four thousand dollars ($34,000). No assistance shall be provided if the amount of the assistance claim is five dollars ($5) or less.

(b) For purposes of allowing assistance provided for by this section:

(1) (A) Only one owner-claimant from one household each year shall be entitled to assistance under this chapter. When two or more individuals of a household are able to meet the qualifications for an owner-claimant, they may determine who the owner-claimant shall be. If they are unable to agree, the matter shall be referred to the Franchise Tax Board
 and its decision shall be final.

(B) When two or more individuals pay rent for the same premises and each individual meets the qualifications for a renter-claimant, each qualified individual shall be entitled to assistance under this part.

For the purposes of this subparagraph, spouses residing in the same premises shall be presumed to be one renter.

(2) Except as provided in paragraph (3), the right to file a claim shall be personal to the claimant and shall not survive his or her death; however, when a claimant dies after having filed a timely claim, the amount thereof may be disbursed to the surviving spouse and, if no surviving spouse, to any other member of the household who is a qualified claimant. If there is no surviving spouse or otherwise qualified claimant, the claim shall be disbursed to any other member of the household. In
 the event two or more individuals qualify for payment as either an otherwise qualified claimant or a member of the household, they may determine which of them will be paid. If they are unable to agree, the matter shall be referred to the Franchise Tax Board and its decision shall be final.

(3) If, after January 1 of the property tax fiscal year for which a claim may be filed, a claimant dies without filing a timely claim, a claim on behalf of such claimant may be filed by the surviving spouse within the filing period prescribed in subdivision (a) or (b) of Section 20563.

(4) If an individual postponed taxes for any given property tax fiscal year under Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 20581), Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 20625), Chapter 3.3 (commencing with Section 20639), or Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 20640), then any claim for assistance under this chapter for
 the same property tax fiscal year shall be filed by such individual (assuming all other eligibility requirements in this chapter are satisfied) and not an otherwise qualified member of the individual’s household.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 50, Sec. 112.   (SB 1005)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

20543.

(a) (1) The amount of assistance for a claimant owning his or her residential dwelling shall be based on the claimant’s household income for the period set forth in Section 20503.

(2) For claims filed with respect to the 2001 calendar year and each calendar year thereafter, the percentage of assistance for which each claimant owning his or her residential dwelling shall be eligible based on the following scale:If the total household income (as defined
 in this part) is not more than:The percentage of tax on 
the first $34,000 of full 
value (as determined 
for tax purposes) used 
to provide assistance 
is:$8,812 139% 9,400 136 9,987 133 10,575 131 11,163 128 11,750 125 12,337 122 12,925 119 13,513 116 14,101 113 14,688 110 15,275 106 15,863 100 16,451 9417,038 8817,626 8318,213 7718,800 7119,389 6519,976 5920,564 5421,151 4921,738 4522,327 4122,914 3623,500 3224,088 2924,675 2625,263 2325,851 2026,438 1727,908 1529,376 1230,846 1032,314 933,783 735,251 6(b) With respect to assistance that is provided by the Franchise Tax Board pursuant to this chapter for the 2002 calendar year and each year thereafter, the household income figures that apply to assistance provided by the Franchise Tax Board during that period shall be the household income figures that applied to assistance provided by the Franchise Tax Board in the same period in the immediately preceding year, multiplied by an inflation factor calculated as follows:

(1) On or before
 February 1 of each year, the Department of Industrial Relations shall transmit to the Franchise Tax Board the percentage change in the California Consumer Price Index for all items from June of the second preceding calendar year to June of the immediately preceding calendar year.

(2) The Franchise Tax Board shall add 100 percent to the percentage change figure that is furnished pursuant to paragraph (1) and divide the result by 100.

(3) The Franchise Tax Board shall multiply the immediately preceding household income figure by the inflation adjustment factor determined in paragraph (2), and round off the resulting product to the nearest one dollar ($1).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 664, Sec. 206.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

20544.

(a) (1) The amount of assistance for a claimant renting his or her residence shall be based on the claimant’s household income for the time period set forth in Section 20503.

(2) For claims filed with respect to the 2001 calendar year, and each calendar year thereafter, the percentage of assistance for which each claimant renting his or her residence shall be eligible shall be based on the following scale:The percentage of theIf the total householdThe statutory statutory property
 tax income (as defined in thisproperty tax equivalent used to part) is not more than:equivalent is: provide assistance is:$8,812 $250 139% 9,400 250 136 9,987 250 13310,575 250 13111,163 250 12811,750 250 12512,337 250 12212,925 250 11913,513 250 11614,101 250 11314,688 250 11015,275 250 10615,863 250 10016,451 250 9417,038 250 8817,626 250 8318,213 250 7718,800 250 7119,389 250 6519,976 250 5920,564 250 5421,151 250 4921,738 250 4522,327 250 4122,914 250 3623,500 250 3224,088 250 2924,675 250 2625,263 250 2325,851 250 2026,438 250 1727,908 250 1529,376 250 1230,846 250 1032,314 250 933,783 250 735,251 250 6(b) With respect to assistance that is provided by the Franchise Tax Board pursuant to this chapter for the 2002 calendar year and each year thereafter, the household income figures that apply to assistance provided
 by the Franchise Tax Board during that period shall be the household income figures that applied to assistance provided by the Franchise Tax Board in the same period in the immediately preceding year, multiplied by an inflation factor calculated as follows:

(1) On or before February 1 of each year, the Department of Industrial Relations shall transmit to the Franchise Tax Board the percentage change in the California Consumer Price Index for all items from June of the second preceding calendar year to June of the immediately preceding calendar year.

(2) The Franchise Tax Board shall add 100 percent to the percentage change figure that is furnished pursuant to paragraph (1) and divide the result by 100.

(3) The Franchise Tax Board shall multiply the immediately preceding household income figure by the inflation
 adjustment factor determined in paragraph (2), and round off the resulting product to the nearest one dollar ($1).

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 156) by Stats. 2001, Ch. 266, Sec. 3.   Effective September 10, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Claims [20561. - 20564.]

20561.

(a) Each individual applying for assistance under Article 2 (commencing with Section 20541) of this chapter shall file a claim under penalty of perjury with the Franchise Tax Board on a form supplied by the board. The claim shall include information in the form and manner prescribed by the Franchise Tax Board that establishes that the individual was a claimant (as defined in Section 20505) eligible for assistance under this chapter.

(b) If a claimant submits a claim that
 satisfies the requirements of this section, the Franchise Tax Board shall compute the amount of assistance and authorize payment. The amount of any assistance otherwise payable under this part may be applied by the Franchise Tax Board against any liability due from the claimant (or the claimant’s spouse if a joint return is filed) under any law administered by the Franchise Tax Board.

(c) The Franchise Tax Board is authorized to prescribe, by regulation, the information necessary to constitute a valid claim under this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 399, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

20562.

For the purposes of this chapter, the requirement that property taxes be paid before assistance can be granted may be waived if the taxes were not paid for reasonable cause and the claimant declares under penalty of perjury that the assistance granted will be promptly applied to pay delinquent property taxes on the residential dwelling to the extent reasonably feasible under the circumstances.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1242.)
-------------------------------------------

20563.

(a) The claim on which the assistance is based shall be filed after June 30 of the fiscal year for which assistance is claimed but on or before October 15 of the fiscal year succeeding the fiscal year for which assistance is claimed. The Franchise Tax Board may thereafter accept claims through June 30 of the fiscal year succeeding the fiscal year for which assistance is claimed.

(b) The state shall assist the claimant after July 15 and before November 15 of the calendar
 year in which the claim is filed, except that if the claim is defective, assistance shall be made as promptly as is practicable after the claim has been perfected.

(c) A claimant who, because of a medical incapacity, is prevented from filing a timely claim, may file a claim within six months after the end of his or her medical incapacity or three years succeeding the end of the fiscal year for which assistance is claimed, whichever date is earlier.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 62, Sec. 290.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

20564.

(a) If a lien for the assistance fiscal year has been acquired against the property, or, in the case of a mobilehome, against the certificate of title, of the claimant by reason of the claimant’s use of a certificate of eligibility which was paid pursuant to Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 16180) of Part 1 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the net payment otherwise due such claimant shall first be applied by the Controller to reduce the obligation secured by such lien.

(b) If a lien has been reduced as provided in subdivision (a) and the Franchise
 Tax Board subsequently determines that the assistance allowed for such year was erroneous, the Franchise Tax Board shall notify the Controller who will make an appropriate adjustment to the lien.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1051, Sec. 17.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Property Tax Postponement [20581. - 20622.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions and Definitions [20581. - 20586.]

20581.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Senior Citizens and Disabled Citizens Property Tax Postponement Law.”

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1578, Sec. 2.   Applicable July 1, 1985, pursuant to Sec. 5 of Ch. 1578.)
-------------------------------------------

20582.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions given in Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 20501) of this part and in this article shall govern the construction of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1242.)
-------------------------------------------

20583.

(a) “Residential dwelling” means a dwelling occupied as the principal place of residence of the claimant and so much of the land surrounding it as is reasonably necessary for use of the dwelling as a home, owned by the claimant, the claimant and spouse, or by the claimant and either another individual eligible for postponement under this chapter or an individual described in subdivision (a), (b), or (c) of Section
 20511 and located in this state. It shall include condominiums and manufactured homes that are assessed as realty for local property tax purposes. It also includes part of a multidwelling or multipurpose building and a part of the land upon which it is built.

(b) As used in this chapter in reference to ownership interests in residential dwellings, “owned” includes (1) the interest of a vendee in possession under a land sale contract provided that the contract or memorandum thereof is recorded and only from the date of recordation of the contract or memorandum thereof in the office of the county recorder where the residential dwelling is located, (2) the interest of the holder of a life estate provided that the instrument creating the life estate is recorded and only from the date of recordation of the instrument creating the life estate in the office of the county recorder where the residential dwelling is located, but “owned” does not include
 the interest of the holder of any remainder interest or the holder of a reversionary interest in the residential dwelling, (3) the interest of a joint tenant or a tenant in common in the residential dwelling or the interest of a tenant where title is held in tenancy by the entirety or a community property interest where title is held as community property, and (4) the interest, including the interest of a beneficiary of a special needs trust, in the residential dwelling in which the title is held in trust, as described in subdivision (d) of Section 62, provided that the Controller determines that the state’s interest is adequately protected.

(c) For purposes of this chapter, the registered owner of a manufactured home shall be deemed to be the owner of the manufactured home.

(d) Except as provided in subdivision (c), and Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 20625), ownership must be
 evidenced by an instrument duly recorded in the office of the county where the residential dwelling is located.

(e) “Residential dwelling” does not include any of the following:

(1) Any residential dwelling in which the owners do not have an equity of at least 40 percent of the full value of the property as determined for purposes of property taxation or at least 40 percent of the fair market value as determined by the Controller and where the Controller determines that the state’s interest is adequately protected. The 40-percent equity requirement shall be met each time the claimant or authorized agent files a postponement claim.

(2) Any residential dwelling in which the claimant’s interest is held pursuant to a contract of sale or under a life estate, unless the claimant obtains the written consent of the vendor
 under the contract of sale, or the holder of the reversionary interest upon termination of the life estate, for the postponement of taxes and the creation of a lien on the real property in favor of the state for amounts postponed pursuant to this act.

(3) Any residential dwelling on which the claimant does not receive a secured tax bill.

(4) Any residential dwelling in which the claimant’s interest is held as a possessory interest, except as provided in Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 20640).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 896, Sec. 12.   (SB 1130)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

20584.

(a) “Property taxes” means all ad valorem property taxes, special assessments, and other charges or user fees which are attributable to the residential dwelling on the county tax bill and the ad valorem property taxes, special assessments, or other charges or user fees appearing on the tax bill of any chartered city which levies and collects its own property taxes.

(b) Whenever a residential dwelling is an integral part of a larger tax unit, such as a duplex, farm or a multipurpose building, “property taxes” shall be the percentage of the total property taxes as the value of the residential dwelling is of the value of the total tax unit.

(c) “Property taxes” means property taxes for current fiscal years for which the claim is made and excludes delinquent taxes for prior fiscal years.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 703, Sec. 29.   (AB 2231)   Effective September 28, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

20585.

(a) Postponement shall not be allowed under this chapter, Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 20625), Chapter 3.3 (commencing with Section 20639), or Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 20640) if household income exceeds the following:

(1) Beginning July 1, 2016, to June 30, 2020, inclusive, thirty-five thousand five hundred dollars ($35,500).

(2) Beginning July 1, 2020, forty-five thousand dollars ($45,000).

(b) (1) Beginning January 1, 2021, and for each assessment year thereafter, the household income limit shall be compounded annually by an inflation factor that is the percentages of increase in the California Consumer Price Index for all Urban Consumers and in the California Consumer Price Index for Urban Wage Earners and Clerical Workers of December of the prior calendar year over December of the preceding calendar year, as determined by the Department of Industrial Relations.

(2) The Controller shall compute an inflation adjustment factor by adding 100 percent to the larger of the California Consumer Price Index percentage increases furnished pursuant to paragraph (1).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 794, Sec. 2.   (AB 133)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

20586.

For the purposes of Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 20581), Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 20625), Chapter 3.3 (commencing with Section 20639), and Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 20640), only one claimant per household each year shall be entitled to postponement. When two or more individuals in a household are qualified as claimants, they may determine who the claimant shall be. Such decision is irrevocable. If the
 individuals are unable to agree, the matter shall be determined by the Controller and his or her decision shall be final.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 896, Sec. 14.   (SB 1130)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Postponement [20601. - 20605.]

20601.

Subject to the limitations provided in this chapter, a claimant may file with the Controller, pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 20621) of this chapter, a claim for postponement from the State of California of a sum equal to, but not exceeding, the amount of property taxes, as defined in Section 20584, due on the residential dwelling for the fiscal year for which the claim is made.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 391, Sec. 10.   (SB 801)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

20602.

Upon approval of a claim described in Section 20601, the Controller shall make payments directly to a county tax collector for the property taxes owed on behalf of a qualified claimant. Payments may, upon appropriation by the Legislature, be made out of the amounts appropriated pursuant to Section 16180 of the Government Code that are secured by a secured tax lien and obligation as specified by Article 1 (commencing with
 Section 16180) of Chapter 5 of Division 4 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 391, Sec. 11.   (SB 801)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

20603.

The Controller shall prescribe the manner in which a claimant eligible under this chapter, who for any reason is incapacitated, may appoint his or her spouse or an authorized agent, or have any such person appointed for such claimant, for all purposes of claiming and receiving postponement of property taxes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 391, Sec. 12.   (SB 801)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

20605.

(a) The postponement of property taxes pursuant to this chapter shall not affect the obligation of a borrower to continue to make payments to a lender with respect to an impound, trust, or other type of account described in Section 2954 of the Civil Code which was established prior to the effective date of subdivision (b).

(b) Except where required by federal law or regulation and notwithstanding Sections 7153.2 and 7153.8 of the Financial Code, or in the case of a loan which is made, guaranteed, or insured by a federal government lending or insuring agency requiring the borrower to
 make payments to a lender with respect to an impound, trust, or other type of account described in Section 2954 of the Civil Code, or where this subdivision would impair the obligations of a loan agreement executed prior to the effective date of this subdivision, no lender shall require a borrower to maintain an impound, trust or other type of account with regard to taxes once such borrower has elected to postpone such taxes pursuant to this chapter and has first submitted to such lender evidence of tax postponement. Any payments made by such borrower, prior to the time of submission of such evidence of tax postponement, to such an impound, trust or other type of account with regard to taxes for any such period, if not previously used in payment or partial payment of such taxes, shall be refunded to such borrower within thirty days thereafter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 373.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Claims [20621. - 20622.]

20621.

Each claimant applying for postponement under Article 2 (commencing with Section 20601) shall file a claim under penalty of perjury with the Controller on a form supplied by the Controller. The claim shall contain all of the following:

(a) Evidence acceptable to the Controller that the person (1) is 62 years of age or older on or before December 31 of the fiscal year for
 which the postponement is claimed or (2) blind or disabled, as defined in Section 12050 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, at the time of application or on February 10 of the fiscal year for which the postponement is claimed.

(b) A statement showing the household income for the period set forth in Section 20503.

(c) A statement describing the residential dwelling in a manner that the Controller may prescribe.

(d) The name of the county in which the residential dwelling is located and the address of the residential dwelling.

(e) The county assessor’s parcel number applicable to the property for which the claimant is applying for the postponement of property taxes.

(f) (1) Documentation evidencing the current existence of any abstract of judgment, federal tax lien, or state tax lien filed or recorded against the applicant, and any recorded mortgage or deed of trust that affects the subject residential dwelling, for the purpose of determining that the claimant possesses a 40-percent equity in the subject residential dwelling as required by paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 20583.

(2) Actual costs, not in excess of fifty dollars ($50), paid by the claimant to obtain the documentation shall reduce the amount of the lien for the year, but not the face amount of the payment prescribed in Section 16180 of the Government Code.

(g) Other information required by the Controller to establish eligibility.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 387, Sec. 25.   (SB 205)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

20622.

The claim for postponement shall be filed after October 1 of the fiscal year in which the postponement is claimed and on or before February 10 of that fiscal year; if February 10th falls on Saturday, Sunday, or a legal holiday, the date is extended to the next business day.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 391, Sec. 14.   (SB 801)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Senior Citizens Tenant-Stockholder Property Tax Postponement Law [20625. - 20638.]

20625.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Senior Citizens Tenant-Stockholder Property Tax Postponement Law”.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 43.)
-------------------------------------------

20626.

Unless the context otherwise requires or unless otherwise provided in this chapter, the definitions given in Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 20501) and Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 20581) shall govern the construction of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 43.)
-------------------------------------------

20627.

A tenant-stockholder claimant (hereinafter referred to as “claimant”) is an individual who, on the last day of the calendar year ending immediately prior to the commencement of the fiscal year for which postponement is claimed is: (a) a tenant-stockholder in a cooperative housing corporation (as defined in Section 216(b) of the Internal Revenue Code) and (b) occupies, as a principal place of residence, a residential unit in the cooperative
 housing corporation (notwithstanding Section 216(b) of the Internal Revenue Code). For the purposes of this chapter, a claimant must be (1) 62 years of age or older on or before December 31 of the fiscal year for which postponement is claimed or (2) blind or disabled, as defined in Section 12050 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, at the time of application or on February 10 of the fiscal year for which the postponement is claimed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 387, Sec. 26.   (SB 205)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

20628.

Residential unit means an apartment or similar dwelling in a cooperative housing corporation, located in this state.
